South Dakota, session 2026, HB1112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 34-46-1 be AMENDED:
34-46-1. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Electronic smoking device," any e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, e-hookah, or vape
pen, containing or delivering nicotine or any other substance with nicotine intended
for human consumption that, which may be used by a person in any manner for
the purpose of inhaling vapor or aerosol from the product. The term does not
include any product approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration
for sale as a tobacco cessation product or for any other therapeutic purpose, and
is marketed and sold solely for that approved purpose;
(2) "Proof of age," a driver's license, nondriver identification card, tribal identification
card, or other generally accepted means of identification that contains a picture of
the individual and appears on its face to be valid;
(3) "Sample," tobacco products distributed to members of the general public at no cost
for purposes of promoting the product;
(4) "Sampling," the distribution of samples to members of the general public in a public
place;
(5) "Self-service display," a display that contains cigarettes or smokeless tobacco, or
both, and is located in an area openly accessible to the merchant's consumers, and
from which such consumers can readily access cigarettes or smokeless tobacco, or
both, without the assistance of the merchant or an employee or agent of the
merchant. A display case that holds tobacco products behind locked doors does not
constitute a self-service display;
(6) "Smoke" or "Smoking," the act of inhaling, exhaling, burning, or carrying any
lighted or heated cigar, cigarette, pipe, hookah, or any other lighted or heated
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1112A 2 1112
tobacco or plant product intended for inhalation, whether natural or synthetic, in
any manner or in any form, including the use of an electronic smoking device which
creates an aerosol or vapor, in any manner or in any form;
(7) "Tobacco product," any item made of tobacco intended for human consumption,
including cigarettes, cigars, pipe tobacco, and smokeless tobacco, and vapor
products as defined in § 34-46-20;
(8) "Tobacco speciality store," a business that derives at least seventy-five percent of
its revenue from the sale of tobacco products.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.